Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.670

Child care provider rules review.

In conjunction with child care providers and other early learning leaders, the department shall review and revise child care provider rules in order to emphasize the need for mutual respect among parents, providers, and state staff who enforce rules. Revised rules shall clearly focus on keeping children safe and improving early learning outcomes for children. The department shall develop a plan by July 2007 that outlines the process and timelines to complete the rules review. Nothing in this section changes the department's responsibility to collectively bargain over mandatory subjects.

[ 2007 c 394 s 7. Formerly RCW 43.215.502.]

NOTES:

Finding—Declaration—Captions not law—2007 c 394: See notes following RCW 43.216.010.